Mississippi, session 2026, HB1725.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "State Aid and Local System Bridge Forfeiture Reserve Fund."  The fund shall consist of monies originally allocated to and subsequently forfeited by counties under the provisions of Sections 65-9-27, 65-37-7 and 65-37-11, and which the State Aid Engineer is authorized to transfer from the "Local System Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Fund" or the "State Aid Road Fund" and deposit into the fund. (2)  Monies that are transferred and deposited into the fund under the provisions of this section may be expended upon requisition therefor by the State Aid Engineer to be used interchangeably for the support of counties which reestablish eligibility for funding allocations under the state aid local system bridge programs as the inventory of deficient bridges decreases within those said counties. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the State Aid and Local System Bridge Forfeiture Reserve Fund. (3)  Monies in the State Aid and Local System Bridge Forfeiture Reserve Fund shall be allocated and become available for distribution to counties in accordance with the guidelines established by the Office of State Aid Road Construction as prescribed in Sections 65-9-27, 65-37-7 and 65-37-11 for the use of forfeited funds, on an as needed basis for those counties whose inventory of deficient state aid and local system bridges is reduced as corrections are made to replace or rehabilitate deficient bridges located therein.  Monies in the State Aid and Local System Bridge Forfeiture Reserve Fund may not be used or expended for any purpose except as authorized under Sections 65-9-1 et seq. and 65-37-1 et seq. (4)  Monies in the State Aid and Local System Bridge Forfeiture Reserve Fund may be credited to a county for specified bridge projects, subject to the approval of the State Aid Engineer upon a determination by the Office of State Aid Road Construction that: (a)  The county has made application to the office requesting an allocation of reserve funds; (b)  The county is not out of compliance, and therefore eligible for receipt and expenditure of the funds; (c)  The county has taken substantial efforts to reduce its inventory of deficient bridges with corrections made to the satisfaction of the State Aid Engineer; and (d)  The unobligated balance in the State Aid and Local System Bridge Forfeiture Reserve Fund is not less than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00). It is the intent of this provision to utilize to the fullest practicable extent the balance of monies in the State Aid and Local System Bridge Forfeiture Reserve Fund on hand at all times to provide additional funding assistance to counties for applicable bridge projects located therein which are approved by the State Aid Engineer as eligible for receipt of funds. SECTION 2.  Section 65-9-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 65-9-17.  (1)  When any county shall have met the requirements of this chapter and shall have become eligible for state aid, the State Aid Engineer, as soon as practicable, shall notify such county in writing of such eligibility and that its proportionate part of any state funds allocated to it for state aid may be utilized for construction in the manner provided by law, and such notice shall also be given in writing to the Department of Finance and Administration and to the State Treasurer. (2)  State aid funds shall be allocated to each county for use on state aid system roads or roads on the Local System Road Program in accordance with the provisions of Section 27-65-75. (3)  State aid funds may be credited to a county in advance of the normal accrual to finance certain state aid improvements, subject to the approval of the State Aid Engineer and subject further to the following limitations: (a)  That the maximum amount of state aid funds that may be advanced to any county shall not exceed ninety percent (90%) of the state aid funds estimated to accrue to such county during the remainder of the term of office of the board of supervisors of such county. (b)  That no advance credit of funds will be made to any county when the unobligated balance in the State Aid Road Fund is less than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00). (c)  That such advance crediting of funds be effected by the State Aid Engineer at the time of the approval of the plans and specifications for the proposed improvements. It is the intent of this provision to utilize to the fullest practicable extent the balance of state aid funds on hand at all times. (4)  State aid funds shall be available to such county to the following extent and in the following manner: (a)  On state aid projects, other than those on or off the federal aid secondary system to be partially financed with federal funds, state aid funds credited to such county in the State Aid Road Fund shall be available to cover the cost of such project.  Upon the awarding of a contract for such state aid project, the board of supervisors of any county will, by an official order of the board, authorize the State Aid Engineer to set up the project fund for such project from that county's state aid fund in the State Treasury.  The amount of the project fund will cover the estimated cost of the project, including the contractor's payments and any other costs authorized under this chapter to be paid from state aid funds.  Withdrawals from the project fund will be made by requisitions prepared by the State Aid Engineer, based on estimates and other supporting statements and documents prepared or approved by the county engineer, such requisitions, accompanied by such estimates and statements, to be directed to the Department of Finance and Administration, which will issue warrants in payment thereof.  Requisitions may be drawn to cover the final cost of the project accepted by the boards of supervisors of the counties affected and the State Aid Engineer, even though such cost exceeds the aforesaid estimated project fund.  Whenever, in the opinion of the State Aid Engineer, it should appear that any such estimate or statement of account has been improperly allowed or that any road construction project is not proceeding in accordance with the plans, specifications and standards set up therefor, then, in such event, due notice in writing shall be given the board of supervisors of such county and the contractor on such project, if any, stating the reason why such account should not have been allowed or why such project is not progressing satisfactorily; and if, within thirty (30) days from the date of such notice in writing, such error or default is not corrected to the satisfaction of the State Aid Engineer, all state aid funds theretofore allocated to such eligible county shall be immediately withdrawn and notice given the Department of Finance and Administration and the State Treasurer that such county has become ineligible therefor.  Such county shall remain ineligible until it again becomes eligible by satisfying the State Aid Engineer as to its eligibility. (b)  On state aid projects on the federal aid secondary system which are to be partially financed with federal funds, state aid funds credited to such county in the State Aid Road Fund shall be available to cover the sponsor's share of the cost of such project.  At the same time, the State Treasurer, on order from the board of supervisors, shall transfer an amount up to one hundred percent (100%) of such cost from the credit of such county in the State Aid Road Fund to the credit of such county in the State Highway Fund, earmarked for such project. (c)  State aid road funds credited to a county in the State Aid Road Fund shall also be available to cover the sponsor's cost of any other project of such county which is partially financed with federal funds available through federal "safer off-system" road funds and/or other federal road funds allocated to the counties as provided for in accordance with Section 65-9-29(2).  On order from the board of supervisors of such county, the State Treasurer shall transfer an amount up to one hundred percent (100%) of such cost from the credit of such county in the State Aid Road Fund to the credit of such county in the State Highway Fund, earmarked for such project. (d)  Up to one-third (1/3) of state aid road funds credited to a county in the State Aid Road Fund may be available to match federal bridge replacement monies or other federal funds, or both, to construct, replace, inspect or post bridges and to conduct pavement management surveys on county roads which are not on the state aid system.  To implement such projects, the State Treasurer shall, as requested in an order from the board of supervisors of the county, make transfers out of the credit of such county in the State Aid Road Fund. (e)  Up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the state aid road funds credited to a county in the State Aid Road Fund may be available for projects authorized under the Local System Road Program.  Withdrawals from the fund for the Local System Road Program will be made by requisitions prepared by the State Aid Engineer, based on estimates and other supporting statements and documents prepared or approved by the county engineer; such requisitions, accompanied by such estimates and statements, to be directed to the Department of Finance and Administration, which will issue warrants in payment thereof.  Requisitions may be drawn to cover the final cost of the local system road project accepted by the boards of supervisors of the counties affected and the State Aid Engineer even though such cost exceeds the aforesaid estimated project fund.  Whenever, in the opinion of the State Aid Engineer, it should appear that any such estimate or statement of account has been improperly allowed or that any road construction project is not proceeding in accordance with the plans, specifications and standards set up therefor, then, in such event, due notice in writing shall be given the board of supervisors of such county and the contractor on such project, if any, stating the reason why such account should not have been allowed or why such project is not progressing satisfactorily; and if, within thirty (30) days from the date of such notice in writing, such error or default is not corrected to the satisfaction of the State Aid Engineer, all state aid funds theretofore allocated to such eligible county shall be immediately withdrawn and notice given the Department of Finance and Administration and the State Treasurer that such county has become ineligible therefor.  Such county shall remain ineligible until it again becomes eligible by satisfying the State Aid Engineer as to its eligibility. (5)  The State Treasurer is hereby authorized to continue to receive and deposit all funds from the federal government made available by it, either by existing law or by any law which may be passed hereafter, to the credit of the State Highway Fund, and the Treasurer shall notify the commission of the amounts so received. All accounts against the above-mentioned funds shall be certified to by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Transportation, who shall request the Department of Finance and Administration to issue its warrant on the State Treasurer for the amount of the accounts; and the Treasurer shall pay same if sufficient funds are available, all in the manner prescribed herein or as may be required by law. (6)  The board of supervisors of each county is hereby authorized and empowered to pay funds into the State Treasury in the manner above set out, and to use and expend such funds for the purposes set out in this chapter.  For the purpose of providing such funds, the board of supervisors is hereby authorized and empowered to use and expend any county road and bridge funds, including revenue received from any gasoline taxes paid to such county, or any funds available in the General Fund, or to issue road and bridge bonds of such county in any lawful amount in the manner and method and subject to the restrictions, limitations and conditions, and payable from the same sources of revenue, now provided by law. (7)  (a)  In addition to any other provisions of this section, funds deposited into the State Aid Road Fund under Section 27-67-31(g) shall be used under this chapter to prioritize the timely repair and replacement of deficient state aid system bridges.  Each county shall be allocated a percentage of such funds as they become available, which percentage shall be based: (i)  One-half (1/2) on the proportion that the total number of state aid system bridges in the county bears to the total number of state aid system bridges in all counties of the state; and (ii)  One-half (1/2) on the proportion that the total square footage of deck area of all state aid system bridges in the county bears to the total square footage of deck area of all state aid system bridges in all counties of the state. (b)  For the purposes of this subsection * * *, : (i)  * * *the term "Deficient bridge" means a bridge with a condition rating of fair or less for its deck, superstructure or substructure, as determined by National Bridge Inspection Standards and that is included on the latest annual bridge inventory prepared by the Office of State Aid Road Construction; and (ii)  * * * the term "State aid system bridge" means a bridge that is included on the latest annual official bridge inventory prepared by the Office of State Aid Road Construction, excluding bridges on the local bridge system and the rural major collector system. SECTION 3.  Section 65-9-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 65-9-27.  Whenever any county is ineligible for state aid under the provisions of this chapter for a continuous period of four (4) years, then * * *such the county shall forfeit * * *and no longer be entitled to any part of the funds in the State Aid Road Fund theretofore allocated to it until such time that the county becomes compliant with correcting any deficiencies giving rise to the ineligibility to the satisfaction of the State Aid Engineer * * *; and.  The balance of * * *such those funds so theretofore allocated to * * *it the forfeiting county shall be maintained in an interest-bearing, itemized reserve account associated with State Aid Road Fund within the State Treasury.  If the forfeiting county remains noncompliant and therefor ineligible for receipt or expenditure of those funds within an additional period of time established by the Office of State Aid Road Construction, the remainder of the outstanding cumulative balance of the county's funds shall be forfeited for transfer into the State Aid and Local System Bridge Forfeiture Reserve Fund * * *reallocated pro rata between by the State Aid Engineer to be allocated to all other eligible counties, * * *in the same relative proportions as those specified in any law providing state aid road funds on an as needed basis, for purposes of making corrections to replace or rehabilitate deficient bridges located therein. SECTION 4.  Section 65-21-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-21-1.  All bridges and culverts hereafter built, rebuilt, or placed in the traveled way of any public road in this state shall conform to the design standards in effect at the time of design and shall extend across the full width of the crown of the roadway. On roads having a design width greater than sixteen feet (16ʹ), bridges shall be not less than sixteen feet (16ʹ) wide.  All bridges hereafter built or rebuilt shall be built with railings or barriers and appropriate hazard marking signs on either side.  This section shall not apply to public highways in this state within the area of, or contingent to, any national forest or reforestation project, which have been or may be taken over, constructed, or reconstructed by a department of the national government, may have bridges or culverts the width of said highways, bridges and culverts be less than twelve feet (12ʹ) wide. SECTION 5.  Section 65-37-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-37-3.  (1)  For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this subsection: (a)  "Deficient bridge" means a bridgethat is eligible for replacement or rehabilitation as determined by the National Bridge Inspection Standards sufficiency rating and that is included on the latest annual official bridge inventory prepared by the Office of State Aid Road Construction as a bridge having a sufficiency rating of fifty (50) or less, excluding bridges on the state aid road system, the municipal urban system and the rural major collector system with a condition rating of fair or less for its deck, superstructure or substructure, as determined by National Bridge Inspection Standards and that is included on the latest annual bridge inventory prepared by the Office of State Aid Road Construction. (b)  "Local system road miles" means all highways, roads and streets within a county, including highways, roads and streets within incorporated municipalities of the county, that are not included on the designated state highway system. (c)  "Local system bridge" means a bridge that is included on the latest annual official bridge inventory prepared by the Office of State Aid Road Construction, excluding bridges on the state aid road system, the municipal urban system and the rural major collector system. (d)  "Bridge" means a bridge that is included on the latest annual official bridge inventory prepared by the Office of State Aid Road Construction. (2)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), from the funds on deposit and credited to the Local System Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Fund created in Section 65-37-13, each county shall be allocated a percentage of such funds as they become available, which percentage shall be based: (ai)  One-half (1/2) on the proportion that the total number of deficient bridges in the county bears to the total number of deficient bridges in all counties of the state; and (bii)  One-half (1/2) on the proportion that the total number of local system road miles in the county bears to the total number of local system road miles in all counties of the state. (b)  From the funds on deposit and credited to the Local System Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Fund created in Section 65-37-13, which are deposited into this fund after the effective date of this act, each county shall be allocated a percentage of such funds as they become available, which percentage shall be based: (i)  One-half (1/2) on the proportion that the total number of local system bridges in the county bears to the total number of local system bridges in all counties of the state; and (ii)  One-half (1/2) on the proportion that the total square footage of deck area of all local system bridges in the county bears to the total square footage of deck area of all local system bridges in all counties of the state. SECTION 6.  Section 65-37-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 65-37-5.  In administering the provisions of this chapter, the State Aid Engineer shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  To supervise the use of all funds made available under this chapter for local bridge replacement and rehabilitation projects on local road systems; (b)  To review and certify all projects for which funds are authorized to be made available under this chapter for local bridge replacement and rehabilitation projects on local road systems; (c)  To requisition monies in the Local System Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Fund and pay and distribute those monies on a project-by-project basis in accordance with the allocation formula established by Section 65-37-3; (d)  To insure that each four-year plan submitted by a county to the State Aid Engineer and the funds allocated to a county under this chapter provide for an equitable distribution of projects and funds among the county and incorporated municipalities located therein based upon the number and costs of deficient bridges in both the county and the municipalities; (e)  To establish and require specific designs and standards to be followed by the counties in replacing and rehabilitating bridges under this chapter, which designs and standards shall equal or exceed the design and standards prescribed for bridges on the state aid road system; (f)  To maintain an accurate record of all local bridge replacement and rehabilitation funds allocated to counties and of the number of bridges replaced or rehabilitated, their location and the costs for each project.  Such records shall be kept separate from other records of the Office of State Aid Road Construction; (g)  To periodically notify the counties of bridges eligible for replacement and rehabilitation under the provisions of this chapter; (h)  To adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary or desirable for the purpose of implementing the provisions of this chapter; * * *and (i)  To file annually with the Legislature a report detailing how monies in the Local System Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Fund were spent during the preceding fiscal year in each county, including in the incorporated municipalities of each county, the number of projects approved and constructed, the length of bridges completed and the cost per foot of each bridge constructed * * *.; and (j)  To supervise the establishment and use of the State Aid and Local System Bridge Forfeiture Reserve Fund as a separate interest-bearing reserve account into which funds forfeited by counties, due to noncompliance, shall be deposited for purposes of being allocated to all other eligible counties, on an as needed basis, for purposes of making corrections to replace or rehabilitate deficient bridges located therein in accordance with this chapter upon a determination by the State Aid Engineer that the county is no longer out of compliance, and therefore eligible for receipt and expenditure of the funds. SECTION 7.  Section 65-37-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 65-37-7.  (1)  In order for a county to be eligible for the expenditure of funds under the provisions of this chapter, the board of supervisors of the county shall meet the following conditions: (a)  On or before January 1, 1995, and on or before January 1 of each year thereafter, the board of supervisors shall present to the State Aid Engineer on a form to be prepared by the State Aid Engineer, a four-year plan of bridge replacement and rehabilitation for the county.  The plan shall identify the project or projects and shall contain a detailed plan prepared and approved by the engineer for the county.  The plan shall specify the condition of the existing bridges included in the project, the drainage requirements, the type of replacement or rehabilitation to be made and the design and specifications therefor.  Four-year plans may be modified each year or more often as necessary provided that the modifications are submitted to the State Aid Engineer. (b)  The county shall agree to employ a qualified engineer and such other technical experts as may be necessary to perform all engineering services required for the projects.  The engineer shall be required to inspect the construction of the projects and to approve all estimate payments made on the projects. (c)  The county and municipalities shall agree to construct, at their own expense, the base and surface of all approaches providing necessary connections to each bridge project within their respective jurisdictions, including the base and surface for culvert projects whenever fill material is placed as part of the contract. (d)  The county and municipalities shall agree to acquire all rights-of-way and relocate or make adjustments to public utilities for each bridge project within their respective jurisdictions as may be necessary in the manner provided by law for the acquisition of rights-of-way and the uniform policy for accommodation of utility facilities within the rights-of-way of state aid roads as adopted by the State Aid Engineer under authority of Section 65-9-1 et seq.  Rights-of-way may be acquired by gift, purchase, deed, dedication or eminent domain.  The only costs that may be paid from funds provided under this chapter for right-of-way acquisition shall be the actual cost paid by the county to the landowner for the land acquired as certified to the State Aid Engineer by the attorney for the board of supervisors.  The only cost that may be paid from funds provided under this chapter for utility adjustments shall be the actual cost paid by the county for utility adjustments pursuant to contract let by the county as certified to the State Aid Engineer by order of the board of supervisors. (2)  A county shall not be eligible for the expenditure of monies allocated to it under this chapter and the State Aid Engineer shall not certify the use or expenditure of such monies on any bridge that is not a deficient bridge as defined by Section 65-37-3(1)(a), unless the State Aid Engineer certifies that all bridges on the local road system within the county for which funds may be made available under this chapter that are deficient are currently under contract for replacement or rehabilitation.  When the State Aid Engineer certifies that all deficient bridges within the county are currently under contract for replacement or rehabilitation, then that county shall: (a)  Be eligible for the expenditure of funds allocated to it according to the formula established in Section 65-37-3(2)(a) for: (i)  The maintenance and replacement of other drainage-related structures in accordance with designs and standards prescribed for such projects by the Office of State Aid Road Construction; (ii)  The Local System Road Program established pursuant to Sections 65-18-1 through 65-18-17; and (iii)  The matching of federal funds for expenditure on state aid roads and bridge replacement in accordance with Section 65-9-29.; and (b)  Be eligible for the expenditure of funds allocated to it according to the formula established in Section 65-37-3(2)(b) solely for the preservation, maintenance and rehabilitation of local system bridges of the county which are deficient bridges as defined in Section 65-37-3(1)(a). (3)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (3), when a county has failed to expend the monies allocated to it under the Local System Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Program, as described in this chapter, for an uninterrupted period of two (2) successive fiscal years, the county shall forfeit and no longer be entitled to the outstanding cumulative balance on hand of the monies that were allocated to it under the program before that period of time. (b)  The county is eligible to receive funds allocated to it in fiscal years occurring after that period of time that caused a forfeiture under the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), unless it so forfeits monies again under that provision. (c)  Monies forfeited each fiscal year under the provisions of this subsection (3) shall be transferred into State Aid and Local System Bridge Forfeiture Reserve Fund and * * * reallocated annually allocated, on an as needed basis, among * * * only those eligible counties that are determined by the State Aid Engineer to have completed all projects in the respective county that are included on the annual official bridge inventory prepared by the Office of State Aid Road Construction * * * Local System Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Program projects that are ready for construction but are not being undertaken due to lack of funds for the purpose of providing additional funding assistance for making corrections to replace or rehabilitate deficient bridges. (d)  Before a forfeiture of funds may occur under the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the State Aid Engineer shall give written notice to the board of supervisors of the county at least ninety (90) days before the forfeiture, and for good cause shown, he may allow the county an additional twelve (12) months to expend the funds subject to the forfeiture. SECTION 8.  Section 65-37-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 65-37-11.  (1)  The board of supervisors of each county and the governing authorities of each municipality shall be responsible for properly maintaining all bridges replaced or repaired in their respective jurisdictions and for performing National Bridge Inspection Standard (NBIS) compliant inspections under the provisions of this chapter. (2)  The State Aid Engineer and his assistants shall make annual maintenance inspections of completed bridge projects andsuch other periodic ensure that NBIS compliant inspections are performed as the State Aid Engineer deems necessary.  If at any time the State Aid Engineer is of the opinion that a county or municipality has not provided NBIS compliant bridge inspections or proper maintenance as required by subsection (1) of this section, he shall give written notice thereof to the board of supervisors of the county or the governing authorities of the municipality of default and direct such maintenance as may be necessary to be performed.  If within sixty (60) days of the receipt of such notice the board of supervisors or governing authorities have not performed such maintenance as may be necessary, then the county or municipality shall not thereafter be eligible to participate in the Local System Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Program. (3)  Whenever any county fails to be eligible for the expenditure of monies allocated to it under the provisions of this chapter for a continuous period of two (2) years because it has failed to properly maintain bridges under the Local System Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Program, then the county shall forfeit * * *and no longer be entitled to any part of the monies in the Local System Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Fund theretofore allocated to it until such time that the county becomes compliant with correcting any deficiencies giving rise to the ineligibility to the satisfaction of the State Aid Engineer.  The balance of the monies theretofore allocated to * * *it the forfeiting county shall be maintained in an interest bearing, itemized reserve account associated with the Local System Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Fund within the State Treasury.  If the forfeiting county remains noncompliant and therefor ineligible for expenditure of the allocated funds within an additional period of time established by the Office of State Aid Road Construction, the remainder of the outstanding cumulative balance of the county's funds shall be forfeited for transfer into the State Aid and Local System Bridge Forfeiture Reserve Fund by the State Aid Engineer to be allocated to * * *shall be reallocated pro rata among all other eligible counties, * * *in accordance with the formula established in Section 65‑37‑3 on an as needed basis, for purposes of making corrections to replace or rehabilitate deficient bridges located therein. (4)  In addition to any other provisions of this section, funds collected from the use tax established under the authority of Section 27-67-31(g) and deposited into the Local System Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Fund created in Section 65-37-13 shall be used to prioritize the timely repair and replacement of deficient local system bridges.  Each county shall be allocated a percentage of such funds as they become available, which percentage shall be based: (i)  One-half (1/2) on the proportion that the total number of deficient bridges in the county bears to the total number of deficient bridges in all counties of the state; and (ii)  One-half (1/2) on the proportion that the total square footage of deck area of all local system bridges in the county bears to the total square footage of deck area of all local system bridges in all counties of the state. SECTION 9.  Section 65-37-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 65-37-15.  Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, when all deficient bridges, as defined by Section 65-37-3(1)(a), of a county have been replaced or are under contract for replacement or rehabilitation, then monies in the Local System Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Fund created under Section 65-37-13, that are allocated to a particular county may be expended for * * *(a) the purpose of paying the principal, interest and debt service on any bonds, notes or obligations issued or incurred by that county before July 1, 1994, for the purpose of replacing or rehabilitating any bridge or drainage‑related structure on any highway, road or street under the jurisdiction of that county, (b) on bridges in the State Aid Road System, or (c) if bridges in the State Aid Road System of that county are in sufficient repair, such monies may be utilized for the repair of roads on the State Aid Road System or local system roads any of the county's local system programs that are specific to deficient bridges, upon presentation to the State Aid Engineer of a resolution duly adopted and entered on the minutes of the board of supervisors of such county requesting such expenditure and reciting in the resolution such information as may be necessary for the State Aid Engineer to determine that the county is eligible for expenditure of funds under the provisions of this section. SECTION 10.  Section 27-104-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-104-7.  (1) (a)  There is created the Public Procurement Review Board, which shall be reconstituted on January 1, 2018, and shall be composed of the following members: (i)  Three (3) individuals appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate; (ii)  Two (2) individuals appointed by the Lieutenant Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate; and (iii)  The Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, serving as an ex officio and nonvoting member. (b)  The initial terms of each appointee shall be as follows: (i)  One (1) member appointed by the Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2019; (ii)  One (1) member appointed by the Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2020; (iii)  One (1) member appointed by the Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2021; (iv)  One (1) member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2019; and (v)  One (1) member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2020. After the expiration of the initial terms, all appointed members' terms shall be for a period of four (4) years from the expiration date of the previous term, and until such time as the member's successor is duly appointed and qualified. (c)  When appointing members to the Public Procurement Review Board, the Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall take into consideration persons who possess at least five (5) years of management experience in general business, health care or finance for an organization, corporation or other public or private entity.  Any person, or any employee or owner of a company, who receives any grants, procurements or contracts that are subject to approval under this section shall not be appointed to the Public Procurement Review Board.  Any person, or any employee or owner of a company, who is a principal of the source providing a personal or professional service shall not be appointed to the Public Procurement Review Board if the principal owns or controls a greater than five percent (5%) interest or has an ownership value of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) in the source's business, whichever is smaller.  No member shall be an officer or employee of the State of Mississippi while serving as a voting member on the Public Procurement Review Board. (d)  Members of the Public Procurement Review Board shall be entitled to per diem as authorized by Section 25-3-69 and travel reimbursement as authorized by Section 25-3-41. (e)  The members of the Public Procurement Review Board shall elect a chair from among the membership, and he or she shall preside over the meetings of the board.  The board shall annually elect a vice chair, who shall serve in the absence of the chair.  No business shall be transacted, including adoption of rules of procedure, without the presence of a quorum of the board.  Three (3) members shall be a quorum. No action shall be valid unless approved by a majority of the members present and voting, entered upon the minutes of the board and signed by the chair. Necessary clerical and administrative support for the board shall be provided by the Department of Finance and Administration.  Minutes shall be kept of the proceedings of each meeting, copies of which shall be filed on a monthly basis with the chairs of the Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives and the chairs of the Appropriations Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives. (2)  The Public Procurement Review Board shall have the following powers and responsibilities: (a)  Approve all purchasing regulations governing the purchase or lease by any agency, as defined in Section 31-7-1, of commodities and equipment, except computer equipment acquired pursuant to Sections 25-53-1 through 25-53-29; (b)  Adopt regulations governing the approval of contracts let for the construction and maintenance of state buildings and other state facilities as well as related contracts for architectural and engineering services. The provisions of this paragraph (b) shall not apply to such contracts involving buildings and other facilities of state institutions of higher learning which are self-administered as provided under this paragraph (b) or Section 37-101-15(m); (c)  Adopt regulations governing any lease or rental agreement by any state agency or department, including any state agency financed entirely by federal funds, for space outside the buildings under the jurisdiction of the Department of Finance and Administration.  These regulations shall require each agency requesting to lease such space to provide the following information that shall be published by the Department of Finance and Administration on its website:  the agency to lease the space; the terms of the lease; the approximate square feet to be leased; the use for the space; a description of a suitable space; the general location desired for the leased space; the contact information for a person from the agency; the deadline date for the agency to have received a lease proposal; any other specific terms or conditions of the agency; and any other information deemed appropriate by the Division of Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration or the Public Procurement Review Board.  The information shall be provided sufficiently in advance of the time the space is needed to allow the Division of Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration to review and preapprove the lease before the time for advertisement begins; (d)  Adopt, in its discretion, regulations to set aside at least five percent (5%) of anticipated annual expenditures for the purchase of commodities from minority businesses; however, all such set-aside purchases shall comply with all purchasing regulations promulgated by the department and shall be subject to all bid requirements.  Set-aside purchases for which competitive bids are required shall be made from the lowest and best minority business bidder; however, if no minority bid is available or if the minority bid is more than two percent (2%) higher than the lowest bid, then bids shall be accepted and awarded to the lowest and best bidder.  However, the provisions in this paragraph shall not be construed to prohibit the rejection of a bid when only one (1) bid is received.  Such rejection shall be placed in the minutes.  For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "minority business" means a business which is owned by a person who is a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United States and who is: (i)  Black:  having origins in any of the black racial groups of Africa; (ii)  Hispanic:  of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban, Central or South American, or other Spanish or Portuguese culture or origin regardless of race; (iii)  Asian-American: having origins in any of the original people of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands; (iv)  American Indian or Alaskan Native:  having origins in any of the original people of North America; or (v)  Female; (e)  In consultation with and approval by the Chairs of the Senate and House Public Property Committees, approve leases, for a term not to exceed eighteen (18) months, entered into by state agencies for the purpose of providing parking arrangements for state employees who work in the Woolfolk Building, the Carroll Gartin Justice Building or the Walter Sillers Office Building; (f)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, promulgate rules and regulations governing the solicitation and selection of contractual services personnel, including personal and professional services contracts for any form of consulting, policy analysis, public relations, marketing, public affairs, legislative advocacy services or any other contract that the board deems appropriate for oversight, with the exception of: 1.  Any personal service contracts entered into by any agency that employs only nonstate service employees as defined in Section 25-9-107(c); 2.  Any personal service contracts entered into for computer or information technology-related services governed by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services; 3.  Any personal service contracts entered into by the individual state institutions of higher learning; 4.  Any personal service contracts entered into by the Mississippi Department of Transportation or the Office of State Aid Road Construction; 5.  Any personal service contracts entered into by the Department of Human Services through June 30, 2019, which the Executive Director of the Department of Human Services determines would be useful in establishing and operating the Department of Child Protection Services; 6.  Any personal service contracts entered into by the Department of Child Protection Services through June 30, 2019; 7.  Any contracts for entertainers and/or performers at the Mississippi State Fairgrounds entered into by the Mississippi Fair Commission; 8.  Any contracts entered into by the Department of Finance and Administration when procuring aircraft maintenance, parts, equipment and/or services; 9.  Any contract entered into by the Department of Public Safety for service on specialized equipment and/or software required for the operation of such specialized equipment for use by the Office of Forensics Laboratories; 10.  Any personal or professional service contract entered into by the Mississippi Department of Health or the Department of Revenue solely in connection with their respective responsibilities under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act from February 2, 2022, through June 30, 2026; 11.  Any contract for attorney, accountant, actuary auditor, architect, engineer, anatomical pathologist, or utility rate expert services; 12.  Any personal service contracts approved by the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration and entered into by the Coordinator of Mental Health Accessibility through June 30, 2022; 13.  Any personal or professional services contract entered into by the State Department of Health in carrying out its responsibilities under the ARPA Rural Water Associations Infrastructure Grant Program through June 30, 2026; 14.  And any personal or professional services contract entered into by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality in carrying out its responsibilities under the Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure Grant Program Act of 2022, through June 30, 2026; 15.  Any personal or professional services contract entered into by an agency for the design, operation or maintenance of museum exhibits.  An agency making a purchase under this exemption shall publicly advertise a Request for Qualifications but shall be otherwise exempt.  Any contracts arising from the use of this exemption must be approved by the Public Procurement Review Board prior to execution by the agency; 16.  Any personal or professional services contract entered into by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality in carrying out its responsibilities under Section 49-2-13(l).  This item 16 shall stand repealed on July 1, 2028; and 17.  Any contract entered into by the State Department of Health for service on specialized equipment and/or software required for the operation of such specialized equipment for the use by the Public Health Laboratory. Any such rules and regulations shall provide for maintaining continuous internal audit covering the activities of such agency affecting its revenue and expenditures as required under Section 7-7-3(6)(d).  Any rules and regulation changes related to personal and professional services contracts that the Public Procurement Review Board may propose shall be submitted to the Chairs of the Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives and the Chairs of the Appropriation Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives at least fifteen (15) days before the board votes on the proposed changes, and those rules and regulation changes, if adopted, shall be promulgated in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Act. (ii)  From and after July 1, 2024, the Public Procurement Review Board shall promulgate rules and regulations that require the Department of Finance and Administration to conduct personal and professional services solicitations as provided in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for those services in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00) for the Department of Marine Resources, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Mississippi Development Authority, with assistance to be provided from these entities.  Any powers that have been conferred upon agencies in order to comply with the provisions of this section for personal and professional services solicitations shall be conferred upon the Department of Finance and Administration to conduct personal and professional services solicitations for the Department of Marine Resources, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Mississippi Development Authority for those services in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00).  The Department of Finance and Administration shall make any submissions that are required to be made by other agencies to the Public Procurement Review Board for the Department of Marine Resources, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Mississippi Development Authority. The provisions of this subparagraph (ii) shall stand repealed on June 30, 2027; (g)  Approve all personal and professional services contracts involving the expenditures of funds in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00), except as provided in paragraph (f) of this subsection (2) and in subsection (8); (h)  Develop mandatory standards with respect to contractual services personnel that require invitations for public bid, requests for proposals, record keeping and financial responsibility of contractors.  The Public Procurement Review Board shall, unless exempted under this paragraph (h) or under paragraph (i) or (o) of this subsection (2), require the agency involved to submit the procurement to a competitive procurement process, and may reserve the right to reject any or all resulting procurements; (i)  Prescribe certain circumstances by which agency heads may enter into contracts for personal and professional services without receiving prior approval from the Public Procurement Review Board.  The Public Procurement Review Board may establish a preapproved list of providers of various personal and professional services for set prices with which state agencies may contract without bidding or prior approval from the board; (i)  Agency requirements may be fulfilled by procuring services performed incident to the state's own programs.  The agency head shall determine in writing whether the price represents a fair market value for the services.  When the procurements are made from other governmental entities, the private sector need not be solicited; however, these contracts shall still be submitted for approval to the Public Procurement Review Board. (ii)  Contracts between two (2) state agencies, both under Public Procurement Review Board purview, shall not require Public Procurement Review Board approval.  However, the contracts shall still be entered into the enterprise resource planning system; (j)  Provide standards for the issuance of requests for proposals, the evaluation of proposals received, consideration of costs and quality of services proposed, contract negotiations, the administrative monitoring of contract performance by the agency and successful steps in terminating a contract; (k)  Present recommendations for governmental privatization and to evaluate privatization proposals submitted by any state agency; (l)  Authorize personal and professional service contracts to be effective for more than one (1) year provided a funding condition is included in any such multiple year contract, except the State Board of Education, which shall have the authority to enter into contractual agreements for student assessment for a period up to ten (10) years.  The State Board of Education shall procure these services in accordance with the Public Procurement Review Board procurement regulations; (m)  Request the State Auditor to conduct a performance audit on any personal or professional service contract; (n)  Prepare an annual report to the Legislature concerning the issuance of personal and professional services contracts during the previous year, collecting any necessary information from state agencies in making such report; (o)  Develop and implement the following standards and procedures for the approval of any sole source contract for personal and professional services regardless of the value of the procurement: (i)  For the purposes of this paragraph (o), the term "sole source" means only one (1) source is available that can provide the required personal or professional service. (ii)  An agency that has been issued a binding, valid court order mandating that a particular source or provider must be used for the required service must include a copy of the applicable court order in all future sole source contract reviews for the particular personal or professional service referenced in the court order. (iii)  Any agency alleging to have a sole source for any personal or professional service, other than those exempted under paragraph (f) of this subsection (2) and subsection (8), shall publish on the procurement portal website established by Sections 25-53-151 and 27-104-165, for at least fourteen (14) days, the terms of the proposed contract for those services.  In addition, the publication shall include, but is not limited to, the following information: 1.  The personal or professional service offered in the contract; 2.  An explanation of why the personal or professional service is the only one that can meet the needs of the agency; 3.  An explanation of why the source is the only person or entity that can provide the required personal or professional service; 4.  An explanation of why the amount to be expended for the personal or professional service is reasonable; and 5.  The efforts that the agency went through to obtain the best possible price for the personal or professional service. (iv)  If any person or entity objects and proposes that the personal or professional service published under subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (o) is not a sole source service and can be provided by another person or entity, then the objecting person or entity shall notify the Public Procurement Review Board and the agency that published the proposed sole source contract with a detailed explanation of why the personal or professional service is not a sole source service. (v)  1.  If the agency determines after review that the personal or professional service in the proposed sole source contract can be provided by another person or entity, then the agency must withdraw the sole source contract publication from the procurement portal website and submit the procurement of the personal or professional service to an advertised competitive bid or selection process. 2.  If the agency determines after review that there is only one (1) source for the required personal or professional service, then the agency may appeal to the Public Procurement Review Board.  The agency has the burden of proving that the personal or professional service is only provided by one (1) source. 3.  If the Public Procurement Review Board has any reasonable doubt as to whether the personal or professional service can only be provided by one (1) source, then the agency must submit the procurement of the personal or professional service to an advertised competitive bid or selection process.  No action taken by the Public Procurement Review Board in this appeal process shall be valid unless approved by a majority of the members of the Public Procurement Review Board present and voting. (vi)  The Public Procurement Review Board shall prepare and submit a quarterly report to the House of Representatives and Senate Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees that details the sole source contracts presented to the Public Procurement Review Board and the reasons that the Public Procurement Review Board approved or rejected each contract.  These quarterly reports shall also include the documentation and memoranda required in subsection (4) of this section.  An agency that submitted a sole source contract shall be prepared to explain the sole source contract to each committee by December 15 of each year upon request by the committee; (p)  Assess any fines and administrative penalties provided for in Sections 31-7-401 through 31-7-423. (3)  All submissions shall be made sufficiently in advance of each monthly meeting of the Public Procurement Review Board as prescribed by the Public Procurement Review Board. If the Public Procurement Review Board rejects any contract submitted for review or approval, the Public Procurement Review Board shall clearly set out the reasons for its action, including, but not limited to, the policy that the agency has violated in its submitted contract and any corrective actions that the agency may take to amend the contract to comply with the rules and regulations of the Public Procurement Review Board. (4)  All sole source contracts for personal and professional services awarded by state agencies, other than those exempted under Section 27-104-7(2)(f) and (8), whether approved by an agency head or the Public Procurement Review Board, shall contain in the procurement file a written determination for the approval, using a request form furnished by the Public Procurement Review Board.  The written determination shall document the basis for the determination, including any market analysis conducted in order to ensure that the service required was practicably available from only one (1) source.  A memorandum shall accompany the request form and address the following four (4) points: (a)  Explanation of why this service is the only service that can meet the needs of the purchasing agency; (b)  Explanation of why this vendor is the only practicably available source from which to obtain this service; (c)  Explanation of why the price is considered reasonable; and (d)  Description of the efforts that were made to conduct a noncompetitive negotiation to get the best possible price for the taxpayers. (5)  In conjunction with the State Personnel Board, the Public Procurement Review Board shall develop and promulgate rules and regulations to define the allowable legal relationship between contract employees and the contracting departments, agencies and institutions of state government under the jurisdiction of the State Personnel Board, in compliance with the applicable rules and regulations of the federal Internal Revenue Service (IRS) for federal employment tax purposes.  Under these regulations, the usual common law rules are applicable to determine and require that such worker is an independent contractor and not an employee, requiring evidence of lawful behavioral control, lawful financial control and lawful relationship of the parties.  Any state department, agency or institution shall only be authorized to contract for personnel services in compliance with those regulations. (6)  No member of the Public Procurement Review Board shall use his or her official authority or influence to coerce, by threat of discharge from employment, or otherwise, the purchase of commodities, the contracting for personal or professional services, or the contracting for public construction under this chapter. (7)  Notwithstanding any other laws or rules to the contrary, the provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall not be applicable to the Mississippi State Port Authority at Gulfport. (8)  Nothing in this section shall impair or limit the authority of the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees' Retirement System to enter into any personal or professional services contracts directly related to their constitutional obligation to manage the trust funds, including, but not limited to, actuarial, custodial banks, cash management, investment consultant and investment management contracts. Nothing in this section shall impair or limit the authority of the State Treasurer to enter into any personal or professional services contracts involving the management of trust funds, including, but not limited to, actuarial, custodial banks, cash management, investment consultant and investment management contracts. (9)  Through December 31, 2026, the provisions of this section related to rental agreements or leasing of real property for the purpose of conducting agency business shall not apply to the Office of Workforce Development created in Section 37-153-7. SECTION 11.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.